Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB336.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby created in the Department of Juvenile Justice a trust and agency
account to be known as the juvenile services fund. The fund shall consist of
moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Department of Juvenile Justice.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for:
(a) Delinquency prevention and early intervention services for youths;
(b) Providing individualized, community-based wraparound services for justice-
involved youths and their families;
(c) Alternatives to detention; and
(d) Re-entry programs and facilities.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide a report on or before September
30 of each year to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary, detailing:
(a) The total amount of funds from the juvenile services fund disbursed since
the last reporting period;
(b) A list of each organization awarded funding from the juvenile services fund
during the reporting period;
(c) The type of service each organization awarded funding during the reporting
period intends to deliver;
(d) The total amount awarded to each organization during the reporting period;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/2/2026 10:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1218
and
(e) Any impacts or trends on juvenile delinquency rates, recidivism rates, and
detention numbers since the last reporting period.
(6) The General Assembly recognizes that expenditures on delinquency prevention,
wraparound services, reentry, and alternatives to detention reduce juvenile
delinquency, recidivism, and involvement in the adult justice system, and
therefore finds that:
(a) The fund established by this section should receive significant funding,
indicative of the Commonwealth's commitment to the future of our youths;
and
(b) The General Assembly should shift the funding priorities in juvenile justice
to reduce the incarceration of youths and increase the use of supportive
programming.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund money in the amount of
$10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the juvenile services fund created in Section 1 of
this Act.
Section 3. Whereas Kentucky has a paramount interest in reducing the number
of incarcerated youths, and the General Assembly is committed to ensuring transparency
and rigorous evaluation of investments to this end, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/2/2026 10:42 AM Jacketed